Hawaii statutes.
[§661-22] Civil actions for false claims.
The attorney general shall investigate any violation under section 661-21. If
the attorney general finds that a person has violated or is violating section
661-21, the attorney general may bring a civil action under this section. [L
2000, c 126, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next